Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 1. Purchase of Services for Minors.

Sec. 47.40.010.
Purchase of services. [Repealed, § 7 ch 119 SLA 1984.]

Sec. 47.40.011.
Purchase of services.

When the department purchases residential services for minors for whom the state has assumed responsibility under AS 47.10 or AS 47.12, the department shall

purchase the services only under grants to local governmental units or nonprofit corporations;

award grants for a specified number of beds as provided in AS

47.40.041

.

The department shall adopt regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of AS

47.40.011

—

47.40.091

, including regulations establishing the procedures to be followed in awarding grants, the types of services for which payment may be made, costs that may be paid with grant money, and the method of payment.

Services of jails and other penal institutions may not be included in services purchased by the state under AS

47.40.011

—

47.40.091

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 119 SLA 1984; am § 52 ch 59 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For residential child care facility grants, see 7 AAC 53, art. 5.

Sec. 47.40.020.
Licensing and supervision. [Repealed, § 7 ch 119 SLA 1984.]

Sec. 47.40.021.
Licensing and supervision.

Facilities providing services that are purchased by the department under AS

47.40.011

—

47.40.091

shall, if required by the department, be licensed and supervised under AS 47.32.

History.

(§ 2 ch 119 SLA 1984; am § 38 ch 57 SLA 2005)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2005 amendment, effective July 2, 2005, updated a section reference.

Collateral references. —

43 C.J.S., Infants, § 370 et seq.

Sec. 47.40.030.
Required accounting procedures. [Repealed, § 7 ch 119 SLA 1984.]

Sec. 47.40.031.
Required accounting procedures.

Facilities that solicit or receive grants from the department for the cost of services provided under AS

47.40.011

—

47.40.091

shall

meet accepted standards of fiscal accountability for public money and shall, upon request, submit to the department and to the division of legislative audit a complete financial statement prepared by an independent certified public accountant;

keep records of the expenditures for the services provided, using cost-accounting procedures in accordance with department regulations;

upon request, furnish the department and the division of legislative audit all fiscal information, books, records, and accounts pertaining to services paid for under AS

47.40.011

—

47.40.091

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 119 SLA 1984)

Administrative Code. —

For residential child care facility grants, see 7 AAC 53, art. 5.

Sec. 47.40.040.
Determination of full cost of services. [Repealed, § 7 ch 119 SLA 1984.]

Sec. 47.40.041.
Grants.

The department shall award grants in accordance with its regulations. The department may award grants for periods not to exceed three years. The department may adjust grant amounts annually, using a cost-of-living allowance formula adopted in its regulations. Grant awards are subject to legislative appropriation. If insufficient money is appropriated to fund all grants awarded, the department shall prorate grant amounts, reduce the number of beds contracted for, or otherwise adjust grants to the extent of the appropriated funds.

Notices published by the department concerning the opening of the application process for a grant award must specify the geographical area in which services are needed, the type of services, the number of beds anticipated to be needed, the maximum number of days of care, and any other requirements established by the department. Grants authorized under this section are exempt from AS 36.30 (State Procurement Code).

Grants may not include payment for

costs, including salaries and fees, incurred in raising funds or lobbying;

costs of academic education that duplicate the public education system, except as provided for in regulations;

costs of religious training; and

costs that are funded by other government sources.

History.

(§ 2 ch 119 SLA 1984; am § 63 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 1 ch 102 SLA 1996)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2008, paragraphs (c)(3) — (5) were renumbered as (c)(2) — (4) to reflect the 1996 repeal of former paragraph (2).

Administrative Code. —

For residential child care facility grants, see 7 AAC 53, art. 5.

For grant programs, see 7 AAC 78.

For grant services for individuals, see 7 AAC 81.

Sec. 47.40.050.
Services. [Repealed, § 7 ch 119 SLA 1984.]

Secs. 47.40.060,
47.40.070.
Placements. [Repealed, § 1 ch 210 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 47.40.080.
Definitions. [Repealed, § 7 ch 119 SLA 1984.]

Sec. 47.40.091.
Definitions.

In AS

47.40.011

—

47.40.091

,

“bed” means space in a facility that may be occupied by a minor for 365 days a year;

“department” means the Department of Health and Social Services;

“nonprofit corporation” means a corporation organized under AS 10.20;

“residential services” means 24-hour care and supervision of minors in residential child care facilities that are commonly known as group homes or institutions.

History.

(§ 2 ch 119 SLA 1984)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 47.40.200. Renumbered in 1984.